lexd_components/hyx-names_hyebased.lexd
#elsewhere
#yan EA style (original)
Աբյան:Աբյան
Ազաբյան:Ազաբյան
Արաբյան:Արաբյան
Անթաբյան:Անթաբյան
Աղաբաբյան:Աղաբաբյան
Զոհրաբյան:Զոհրաբյան
Զուրաբյան:Զուրաբյան
Լուլաքաբաբյան:Լուլաքաբաբյան
Բեգյան:Բեգյան
Ալագյան:Ալագյան
Աշըգյան:Աշըգյան
Ավագյան:Ավագյան
Արեգյան:Արեգյան
Գեւորգյան:Գեւորգյան
#Գևորգյան:Գևորգյան #digraph form
Կարագյան:Կարագյան
Աբդուլգյան:Աբդուլգյան
Ավդալբեգյան:Ավդալբեգյան
Տեր-Գեւորգյան:Տեր-Գեւորգյան
#Տեր-Գևորգյան:Տեր-Գևորգյան #digraph form
Ադյան:Ադյան
Աբադյան:Աբադյան
Աբարդյան:Աբարդյան
Ազգալդյան:Ազգալդյան
Ազգելդյան:Ազգելդյան
Ալվանդյան:Ալվանդյան
Աղազադյան:Աղազադյան
Բեկզադյան:Բեկզադյան
Մանանդյան:Մանանդյան
Մուրադյան:Մուրադյան
Ֆահրադյան:Ֆահրադյան
Ալավերդյան:Ալավերդյան
Անղալադյան:Անղալադյան
Բեհբուդյան:Բեհբուդյան
Աբլաբուդյան:Աբլաբուդյան
Բագրեւանդյան:Բագրեւանդյան
#Բագրևանդյան:Բագրևանդյան  #digraph form
Ալլահվերդյան:Ալլահվերդյան
Թերզյան:Թերզյան
Ազյան:Ազյան
Աբազյան:Աբազյան
Աբոզյան:Աբոզյան
Ագոզյան:Ագոզյան
Ազիզյան:Ազիզյան
Այազյան:Այազյան
Աբրազյան:Աբրազյան
Աթգոզյան:Աթգոզյան
Աթերզյան:Աթերզյան
Այվազյան:Այվազյան
Արտազյան:Արտազյան
Բաբազյան:Բաբազյան
Գազազյան:Գազազյան
Թամազյան:Թամազյան
Ադիգոզյան:Ադիգոզյան
Ազիլազյան:Ազիլազյան
Աթընըզյան:Աթընըզյան
Աթինիզյան:Աթինիզյան
Ալագոզյան:Ալագոզյան
Բեքմեզյան:Բեքմեզյան
Գաբուզյան:Գաբուզյան
Գաթռոզյան:Գաթռոզյան
Թամրազյան:Թամրազյան
Ագրամազյան:Ագրամազյան
Ալագյոզյան:Ալագյոզյան
Այլամազյան:Այլամազյան
Ասքանազյան:Ասքանազյան
Բուռնազյան:Բուռնազյան
Աչիքգյոզյան:Աչիքգյոզյան
Ապաղցըյան:Ապաղցըյան
Աթյան:Աթյան
Աբեթյան:Աբեթյան
Իգիթյան:Իգիթյան
Բոլաթյան:Բոլաթյան
Մադաթյան:Մադաթյան
Ալադաթյան:Ալադաթյան
Դովլաթյան:Դովլաթյան
Բունիաթյան:Բունիաթյան
Բայբուրթյան:Բայբուրթյան
Մանվելյան:Մանվելյան
Առաքելյան:Առաքելյան
Ագլյան:Ագլյան
Բալյան:Բալյան
Գալյան:Գալյան
Աբալյան:Աբալյան
Աբելյան:Աբելյան
Ագիլյան:Ագիլյան
Ադալյան:Ադալյան
Ադելյան:Ադելյան
Ադիլյան:Ադիլյան
Աթալյան:Աթալյան
Աթելյան:Աթելյան
Ամելյան:Ամելյան
Ասիլյան:Ասիլյան
Ավալյան:Ավալյան
Աբակլյան:Աբակլյան
Աբդալյան:Աբդալյան
Աբուլյան:Աբուլյան
Ագուլյան:Ագուլյան
Ագրալյան:Ագրալյան
Ադուլյան:Ադուլյան
Ազմելյան:Ազմելյան
Ազուլյան:Ազուլյան
Աղբալյան:Աղբալյան
Ապտալյան:Ապտալյան
Ապրիլյան:Ապրիլյան
Ավդալյան:Ավդալյան
Աքուլյան:Աքուլյան
Բաբալյան:Բաբալյան
Բաբելյան:Բաբելյան
Բադալյան:Բադալյան
Բաշալյան:Բաշալյան
Բեդելյան:Բեդելյան
Դադալյան:Դադալյան
Սայիլյան:Սայիլյան
Աբդուլյան:Աբդուլյան
Ագրակլյան:Ագրակլյան
Ադանալյան:Ադանալյան
Ադանելյան:Ադանելյան
Ազգուլյան:Ազգուլյան
Ալաջալյան:Ալաջալյան
Աղամալյան:Աղամալյան
Աղապալյան:Աղապալյան
Աղավելյան:Աղավելյան
Ատանալյան:Ատանալյան
Բաբաբլյան:Բաբաբլյան
Բայթալյան:Բայթալյան
Դանիելյան:Դանիելյան
Թաթուլյան:Թաթուլյան
Ադգեզալյան:Ադգեզալյան
Ադիմզալյան:Ադիմզալյան
Աղտամալյան:Աղտամալյան
Աքարճալյան:Աքարճալյան
Գաբրիելյան:Գաբրիելյան
Գազտաղլյան:Գազտաղլյան
Միքայելյան:Միքայելյան
Աթագյուլյան:Աթագյուլյան
Աթոռակալյան:Աթոռակալյան
Աղագյուլյան:Աղագյուլյան
Ավթանդիլյան:Ավթանդիլյան
Աֆթանդիլյան:Աֆթանդիլյան
Բեկկյուլյան:Բեկկյուլյան
Բուրչաքլյան:Բուրչաքլյան
Բրավատալյան:Բրավատալյան
Ադիգյոզալյան:Ադիգյոզալյան
Գասգանտիլյան:Գասգանտիլյան
Մելիք-Աղամալյան:Մելիք-Աղամալյան
Բաբախյան:Բաբախյան
Առեղծյան:Առեղծյան
Առյուծյան:Առյուծյան
Մանուկյան:Մանուկյան
Բեկյան:Բեկյան
Աբակյան:Աբակյան
Աբիկյան:Աբիկյան
Ադիկյան:Ադիկյան
Ազիկյան:Ազիկյան
Աթակյան:Աթակյան
Աթիկյան:Աթիկյան
Ախիկյան:Ախիկյան
Աֆիկյան:Աֆիկյան
Բժիկյան:Բժիկյան
Բժշկյան:Բժշկյան
Աբուկյան:Աբուկյան
Աբրիկյան:Աբրիկյան
Ազբեկյան:Ազբեկյան
Աժտիկյան:Աժտիկյան
Աիտիկյան:Աիտիկյան
Ամրիկյան:Ամրիկյան
Արշակյան:Արշակյան
Ափրիկյան:Ափրիկյան
Աֆրիկյան:Աֆրիկյան
Բադիկյան:Բադիկյան
Բազիկյան:Բազիկյան
Բատիկյան:Բատիկյան
Բարակյան:Բարակյան
Բոջիկյան:Բոջիկյան
Գաբիկյան:Գաբիկյան
Գալիկյան:Գալիկյան
Երզնկյան:Երզնկյան
Եփրիկյան:Եփրիկյան
Էլբակյան:Էլբակյան
Սիսակյան:Սիսակյան
Ադիբեկյան:Ադիբեկյան
Ազատիկյան:Ազատիկյան
Ազարիկյան:Ազարիկյան
Աթաբեկյան:Աթաբեկյան
Ալաբեկյան:Ալաբեկյան
Աղաբեկյան:Աղաբեկյան
Աղանիկյան:Աղանիկյան
Անանիկյան:Անանիկյան
Անդրիկյան:Անդրիկյան
Բախտիկյան:Բախտիկյան
Բամպակյան:Բամպակյան
Բանթիկյան:Բանթիկյան
Բարթիկյան:Բարթիկյան
Բարձիկյան:Բարձիկյան
Բոսնակյան:Բոսնակյան
Գայբակյան:Գայբակյան
Գառնիկյան:Գառնիկյան
Երիբեկյան:Երիբեկյան
Սեդրակյան:Սեդրակյան
Աբեթնակյան:Աբեթնակյան
Աբուլակյան:Աբուլակյան
Ազարբեկյան:Ազարբեկյան
Ազիզբեկյան:Ազիզբեկյան
Աթարբեկյան:Աթարբեկյան
Ալաբերկյան:Ալաբերկյան
Աղանբեկյան:Աղանբեկյան
Ամիրբեկյան:Ամիրբեկյան
Ասլիբեկյան:Ասլիբեկյան
Արիստակյան:Արիստակյան
Բունջիկյան:Բունջիկյան
Ջանիբեկյան:Ջանիբեկյան
Ալաբիլիկյան:Ալաբիլիկյան
Անդրանիկյան:Անդրանիկյան
Բալասբեկյան:Բալասբեկյան
Բարունակյան:Բարունակյան
Բեժանբեկյան:Բեժանբեկյան
Աբագուլակյան:Աբագուլակյան
Գասպարբեկյան:Գասպարբեկյան
Աշպահյան:Աշպահյան
Աթաբահյան:Աթաբահյան
Բաննահյան:Բաննահյան
Ապտուլլահյան:Ապտուլլահյան
Աբաղյան:Աբաղյան
Աբեղյան:Աբեղյան
Անմեղյան:Անմեղյան
Բալաղյան:Բալաղյան
Բահաղյան:Բահաղյան
Դաբաղյան:Դաբաղյան
Կոթողյան:Կոթողյան
Ամիրաղյան:Ամիրաղյան
Բալուղյան:Բալուղյան
Բարթողյան:Բարթողյան
Բարսեղյան:Բարսեղյան
Բուդաղյան:Բուդաղյան
Մուշեղյան:Մուշեղյան
Բարդուղյան:Բարդուղյան
Բաշինջաղյան:Բաշինջաղյան
Աշճյան:Աշճյան
Աթեճյան:Աթեճյան
Ալոճյան:Ալոճյան
Ապաճյան:Ապաճյան
Գալճյան:Գալճյան
Աթմաճյան:Աթմաճյան
Գաթրճյան:Գաթրճյան
Ալաճաճյան:Ալաճաճյան
Այտընճյան:Այտընճյան
Արապաճյան:Արապաճյան
Բեմպեճյան:Բեմպեճյան
Գաբուճյան:Գաբուճյան
Գազանճյան:Գազանճյան
Գաթըրճյան:Գաթըրճյան
Գալայճյան:Գալայճյան
Գալեմճյան:Գալեմճյան
Գայֆեճյան:Գայֆեճյան
Գավալճյան:Գավալճյան
Ալաբերճյան:Ալաբերճյան
Բեքմեզճյան:Բեքմեզճյան
Գաբամաճյան:Գաբամաճյան
Գալփագճյան:Գալփագճյան
Գանթարճյան:Գանթարճյան
Գապառաճյան:Գապառաճյան
Գապարաճյան:Գապարաճյան
Գապպենճյան:Գապպենճյան
Բամպուքճյան:Բամպուքճյան
Բաղրամյան:Բաղրամյան
Մամյան:Մամյան
Աբամյան:Աբամյան
Ադամյան:Ադամյան
Ադիմյան:Ադիմյան
Աթամյան:Աթամյան
Աղամյան:Աղամյան
Աճեմյան:Աճեմյան
Արամյան:Արամյան
Աքիմյան:Աքիմյան
Երեմյան:Երեմյան
Ադումյան:Ադումյան
Աթումյան:Աթումյան
Ատովմյան:Ատովմյան
Գեղամյան:Գեղամյան
Եփրեմյան:Եփրեմյան
Ազարամյան:Ազարամյան
Առստամյան:Առստամյան
Բաբումյան:Բաբումյան
Բայրամյան:Բայրամյան
Բաստամյան:Բաստամյան
Բարթեմյան:Բարթեմյան
Բարղամյան:Բարղամյան
Թորգոմյան:Թորգոմյան
Խոջումյան:Խոջումյան
Աբրահամյան:Աբրահամյան
Ազարումյան:Ազարումյան
Աղազարմյան:Աղազարմյան
Ավետումյան:Ավետումյան
Բաբլումյան:Բաբլումյան
Բարաղամյան:Բարաղամյան
Մեժլումյան:Մեժլումյան
Մելքումյան:Մելքումյան
Աբիսալոմյան:Աբիսալոմյան
Աբիսողոմյան:Աբիսողոմյան
Առուստամյան:Առուստամյան
Մազմանյան:Մազմանյան
Մնացականյան:Մնացականյան
Բանյան:Բանյան
Տոնյան:Տոնյան
Աբանյան:Աբանյան
Ադանյան:Ադանյան
Ազանյան:Ազանյան
Աթանյան:Աթանյան
Աթենյան:Աթենյան
Աթինյան:Աթինյան
Ականյան:Ականյան
Ակինյան:Ակինյան
Ակոնյան:Ակոնյան
Աղանյան:Աղանյան
Անանյան:Անանյան
Ափինյան:Ափինյան
Գալնյան:Գալնյան
Եգանյան:Եգանյան
Աթունյան:Աթունյան
Ալլանյան:Ալլանյան
Ակունյան:Ակունյան
Այդինյան:Այդինյան
Այտընյան:Այտընյան
Անտոնյան:Անտոնյան
Առվանյան:Առվանյան
Ասլանյան:Ասլանյան
Արզանյան:Արզանյան
Արթինյան:Արթինյան
Արմենյան:Արմենյան
Արսենյան:Արսենյան
Բաբանյան:Բաբանյան
Բեժանյան:Բեժանյան
Բեջանյան:Բեջանյան
Բերինյան:Բերինյան
Գաբինյան:Գաբինյան
Գաթենյան:Գաթենյան
Գալընյան:Գալընյան
Դիլանյան:Դիլանյան
Երկանյան:Երկանյան
Հաջինյան:Հաջինյան
Մելանյան:Մելանյան
Մեքինյան:Մեքինյան
Աբադանյան:Աբադանյան
Աբաջանյան:Աբաջանյան
Ադիխանյան:Ադիխանյան
Ադիմանյան:Ադիմանյան
Ադլխանյան:Ադլխանյան
Աթախանյան:Աթախանյան
Աթամանյան:Աթամանյան
Աթաջանյան:Աթաջանյան
Ալթունյան:Ալթունյան
Ալիխանյան:Ալիխանյան
Ալիշանյան:Ալիշանյան
Ահարոնյան:Ահարոնյան
Աղախանյան:Աղախանյան
Աղաջանյան:Աղաջանյան
Ամիրանյան:Ամիրանյան
Արսլանյան:Արսլանյան
Բախչինյան:Բախչինյան
Բաղմանյան:Բաղմանյան
Բարունյան:Բարունյան
Բողդանյան:Բողդանյան
Բոռչանյան:Բոռչանյան
Դարբինյան:Դարբինյան
Թումանյան:Թումանյան
Կոստանյան:Կոստանյան
Մարդանյան:Մարդանյան
Ստեփանյան:Ստեփանյան
Քանքանյան:Քանքանյան
Աբասխանյան:Աբասխանյան
Աբուջանյան:Աբուջանյան
Ադիլխանյան:Ադիլխանյան
Ազատխանյան:Ազատխանյան
Ազիզխանյան:Ազիզխանյան
Աժտեհանյան:Աժտեհանյան
Ալեքսանյան:Ալեքսանյան
Ալիքսանյան:Ալիքսանյան
Ամիրխանյան:Ամիրխանյան
Ամիրջանյան:Ամիրջանյան
Առուշանյան:Առուշանյան
Արասխանյան:Արասխանյան
Արծրունյան:Արծրունյան
Արմաղանյան:Արմաղանյան
Բաբախանյան:Բաբախանյան
Բաբաջանյան:Բաբաջանյան
Բաթաբանյան:Բաթաբանյան
Բալասանյան:Բալասանյան
Բարեջանյան:Բարեջանյան
Բեգիջանյան:Բեգիջանյան
Գալստանյան:Գալստանյան
Գայաճանյան:Գայաճանյան
Աբուտխանյան:Աբուտխանյան
Աթանագինյան:Աթանագինյան
Աժդերհանյան:Աժդերհանյան
Աժտերխանյան:Աժտերխանյան
Արզումանյան:Արզումանյան
Բեզիրգանյան:Բեզիրգանյան
Ղարիբջանյան:Ղարիբջանյան
Բադրուպանյան:Բադրուպանյան
Աբիսողոմոնյան:Աբիսողոմոնյան
Հարությունյան:Հարությունյան
Տեր-Ստեփանյան:Տեր-Ստեփանյան
Քեշիշյան:Քեշիշյան
Յուզբաշյան:Յուզբաշյան
Բաշյան:Բաշյան
Աբաշյան:Աբաշյան
Աբեշյան:Աբեշյան
Աբոշյան:Աբոշյան
Ագիշյան:Ագիշյան
Ադիշյան:Ադիշյան
Աթաշյան:Աթաշյան
Աթեշյան:Աթեշյան
Ախաշյան:Ախաշյան
Ակիշյան:Ակիշյան
Արեշյան:Արեշյան
Բաղշյան:Բաղշյան
Ագգաշյան:Ագգաշյան
Ազգոշյան:Ազգոշյան
Աթբաշյան:Աթբաշյան
Աղպաշյան:Աղպաշյան
Անուշյան:Անուշյան
Քալաշյան:Քալաշյան
Ադաբաշյան:Ադաբաշյան
Ադոբաշյան:Ադոբաշյան
Ալաբաշյան:Ալաբաշյան
Անույշյան:Անույշյան
Գանգաշյան:Գանգաշյան
Քարդաշյան:Քարդաշյան
Քարտաշյան:Քարտաշյան
Աթչյան:Աթչյան
Ավչյան:Ավչյան
Բաղչյան:Բաղչյան
Աթմաչյան:Աթմաչյան
Անագչյան:Անագչյան
Գալաչյան:Գալաչյան
Մկրտչյան:Մկրտչյան
Արուտչյան:Արուտչյան
Բերուչյան:Բերուչյան
Բոլորչյան:Բոլորչյան
Բոյախչյան:Բոյախչյան
Գազանչյան:Գազանչյան
Բարութչյան:Բարութչյան
Ագապյան:Ագապյան
Արապյան:Արապյան
Ագրապյան:Ագրապյան
Գասապյան:Գասապյան
Անտելեպյան:Անտելեպյան
Աիջյան:Աիջյան
Ադաջյան:Ադաջյան
Աթաջյան:Աթաջյան
Ագուջյան:Ագուջյան
Աթմաջյան:Աթմաջյան
Աժանջյան:Աժանջյան
Բոյաջյան:Բոյաջյան
Հալաջյան:Հալաջյան
Ալաջաջյան:Ալաջաջյան
Ալչուջյան:Ալչուջյան
Արաբաջյան:Արաբաջյան
Բաբուջյան:Բաբուջյան
Էնֆիաջյան:Էնֆիաջյան
Թոքմաջյան:Թոքմաջյան
Ալպոյաջյան:Ալպոյաջյան
Բոստանջյան:Բոստանջյան
Բոնջուքջյան:Բոնջուքջյան
Աճառյան:Աճառյան
Թորոսյան:Թորոսյան
Սարգսյան:Սարգսյան
Հովհաննիսյան:Հովհաննիսյան
Աբասյան:Աբասյան
Աթասյան:Աթասյան
Աղասյան:Աղասյան
Անասյան:Անասյան
Արիսյան:Արիսյան
Թեւոսյան:Թեւոսյան
#Թևոսյան:Թևոսյան #digraph form
Աբրեսյան:Աբրեսյան
Ապրեսյան:Ապրեսյան
Պողոսյան:Պողոսյան
Ագանեսյան:Ագանեսյան
Աթանասյան:Աթանասյան
Աթանեսյան:Աթանեսյան
Աթանիսյան:Աթանիսյան
Աթանոսյան:Աթանոսյան
Ավետիսյան:Ավետիսյան
Աֆանասյան:Աֆանասյան
Բիթլիսյան:Բիթլիսյան
Թադեւոսյան:Թադեւոսյան
#Թադևոսյան:Թադևոսյան #digraph form
Թովմասյան:Թովմասյան
Թումասյան:Թումասյան
Մահտեսյան:Մահտեսյան
Մովսիսյան:Մովսիսյան
Ներսեսյան:Ներսեսյան
Ներսիսյան:Ներսիսյան
Պետրոսյան:Պետրոսյան
Ագրիպասյան:Ագրիպասյան
Անաստասյան:Անաստասյան
Անդրեասյան:Անդրեասյան
Անդրիասյան:Անդրիասյան
Նիկողոսյան:Նիկողոսյան
Սանթրոսյան:Սանթրոսյան
Ավսարգիսյան:Ավսարգիսյան
Բարիլուսյան:Բարիլուսյան
Արիստակեսյան:Արիստակեսյան
Տեր-Մահտեսյան:Տեր-Մահտեսյան
Տեր-Հովհաննիսյան:Տեր-Հովհաննիսյան
Աբովյան:Աբովյան
Ազլվյան:Ազլվյան
Ազլիվյան:Ազլիվյան
Աղալովյան:Աղալովյան
Կարապետյան:Կարապետյան
Օտյան:Օտյան
Ախտյան:Ախտյան
Ազատյան:Ազատյան
Ամատյան:Ամատյան
Ապատյան:Ապատյան
Ավետյան:Ավետյան
Աբարտյան:Աբարտյան
Աղքատյան:Աղքատյան
Այվատյան:Այվատյան
Բոլատյան:Բոլատյան
Բրուտյան:Բրուտյան
Գալստյան:Գալստյան
Խառատյան:Խառատյան
Արարատյան:Արարատյան
Արեւշատյան:Արեւշատյան
#Արևշատյան:Արևշատյան #digraph form
Բաղդատյան:Բաղդատյան
Ապլահատյան:Ապլահատյան
Գալուստյան:Գալուստյան
Առնավուտյան:Առնավուտյան
Հայրապետյան:Հայրապետյան
Ալլահվերտյան:Ալլահվերտյան
Ազարյան:Ազարյան
Զաքարյան:Զաքարյան
Ագրյան:Ագրյան
Ազրյան:Ազրյան
Ասրյան:Ասրյան
Ատրյան:Ատրյան
Բերյան:Բերյան
Բորյան:Բորյան
Զորյան:Զորյան
Աբարյան:Աբարյան
Աբերյան:Աբերյան
Աբիրյան:Աբիրյան
Ազիրյան:Ազիրյան
Աթարյան:Աթարյան
Ամարյան:Ամարյան
Ամիրյան:Ամիրյան
Բաղրյան:Բաղրյան
Աբգարյան:Աբգարյան
Աբկարյան:Աբկարյան
Ադդարյան:Ադդարյան
Ադուրյան:Ադուրյան
Ազդարյան:Ազդարյան
Աթթարյան:Աթթարյան
Աժդարյան:Աժդարյան
Աժտերյան:Աժտերյան
Ալվարյան:Ալվարյան
Ամբարյան:Ամբարյան
Աշգարյան:Աշգարյան
Ասատրյան:Ասատրյան
Ասկարյան:Ասկարյան
Ասկերյան:Ասկերյան
Ասմարյան:Ասմարյան
Ավգերյան:Ավգերյան
Ավշարյան:Ավշարյան
Ատուրյան:Ատուրյան
Աքթերյան:Աքթերյան
Բադիրյան:Բադիրյան
Բալարյան:Բալարյան
Բեքարյան:Բեքարյան
Զախարյան:Զախարյան
Ղազարյան:Ղազարյան
Ագապերյան:Ագապերյան
Աթալարյան:Աթալարյան
Ալփիարյան:Ալփիարյան
Աղազարյան:Աղազարյան
Աղափիրյան:Աղափիրյան
Աուշտրյան:Աուշտրյան
Ասծատրյան:Ասծատրյան
Աստուրյան:Աստուրյան
Արփիարյան:Արփիարյան
Բաբուրյան:Բաբուրյան
Բահաթրյան:Բահաթրյան
Բեբուրյան:Բեբուրյան
Բեգլարյան:Բեգլարյան
Բեյլերյան:Բեյլերյան
Բերբերյան:Բերբերյան
Բուխարյան:Բուխարյան
Գամպերյան:Գամպերյան
Գայսարյան:Գայսարյան
Գանթարյան:Գանթարյան
Գասպարյան:Գասպարյան
Գրիգորյան:Գրիգորյան
Դեմուրյան:Դեմուրյան
Խաչատրյան:Խաչատրյան
Ծատուրյան:Ծատուրյան
Ղամբարյան:Ղամբարյան
Մարգարյան:Մարգարյան
Ագշեհիրյան:Ագշեհիրյան
Ադաթուրյան:Ադաթուրյան
Ազգալդրյան:Ազգալդրյան
Ազնաուրյան:Ազնաուրյան
Ազնավորյան:Ազնավորյան
Աժդահարյան:Աժդահարյան
Ալամդարյան:Ալամդարյան
Աղանուրյան:Աղանուրյան
Այտապիրյան:Այտապիրյան
Ասատուրյան:Ասատուրյան
Գամպուրյան:Գամպուրյան
Ենգիբարյան:Ենգիբարյան
